Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.100

Benefits not contractual right until date specified.

(1) The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 239, Laws of 1995 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to July 1, 1996. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to July 1, 1996.

(2) The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 341, Laws of 1998 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to September 1, 2000. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to September 1, 2000.

(3) The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 247, Laws of 2000 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to March 1, 2002. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to March 1, 2002.

[ 2000 c 247 s 406; 1998 c 341 s 305; 1995 c 239 s 325.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.